District of Columbia statutes.
42-1754

Repealed

Injunctions.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 16, 30 DCR 390
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(r), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 45-1935.
Delegation of authority under Law 4-209, see Mayor’s Order 83-123, May 6, 1983.